Utah statutes.
9-4-708.   Annual accounting.

(1)  The executive director shall monitor the activities of recipients of grants and loans issued under this part on a yearly basis to ensure compliance with the terms and conditions imposed on the recipient by the director with the approval of the board or by this part.

(2)  The entities receiving grants or loans shall provide the executive director with an annual accounting of how the moneys they received from the fund have been spent.

(3)  The executive director shall make an annual report to the board accounting for the expenditures authorized by the board.

(4)  The board shall submit an annual written report to the Workforce Services and Community and Economic Development Interim Committee before December 1 of each year:

(a)  accounting for expenditures authorized by the board; and

(b)  evaluating the effectiveness of the program.

